Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.320

Crimes against children—Mandatory termination of classified employees—Appeal—Recovery of salary or compensation by district.

(1) The school district board of directors shall immediately terminate the employment of any classified employee who has contact with children during the course of his or her employment upon a guilty plea or conviction of any felony crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322.

(2) The employee shall have a right of appeal under chapter 28A.645 RCW including any right of appeal under a collective bargaining agreement. A school district board of directors is entitled to recover from the employee any salary or other compensation that may have been paid to the employee for the period between such time as the employee was placed on administrative leave, based upon criminal charges that the employee committed a felony crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322, and the time termination becomes final.

[ 2009 c 396 s 2; 1990 c 33 s 383; 1989 c 320 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.58.1001.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 320: See note following RCW 28A.410.090.

Notification of conviction or guilty plea of certain felony crimes: RCW 43.43.845.